Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Western Regional Higher Education Compact

§ 21-16-201.
Ratification.

The legislature of the state of Wyoming hereby approves, ratifies and adopts the “Western Regional Higher Education Compact”, approved by the western governors conference meeting at Denver, Colorado on November 10, 1950, which compact is as follows:

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 106, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-332; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-1-201.

Article I

Whereas, the future of this nation and of the western states is dependent upon the quality of the education of its youth; and

Whereas, many of the western states individually do not have sufficient numbers of potential students to warrant the establishment and maintenance within their borders of adequate facilities in all of the essential fields of technical, professional and graduate training, nor do all of the states have the financial ability to furnish within their borders institutions capable of providing acceptable standards of training in all of the fields mentioned above; and

Whereas, it is believed that the western states, or group of such states within the region, cooperatively can provide acceptable and efficient educational facilities to meet the needs of the region and of the students thereof:

Now, therefore, the states of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming, and the territories of Alaska and Hawaii, do hereby covenant and agree as follows:

Article II

Each of the compacting states and territories pledge to each of the other compacting states and territories faithful cooperation in carrying out all the purposes of this compact.

Article III

The compacting states and territories hereby create the western interstate commission for higher education, hereinafter called the commission. Said commission shall be a body corporate of each compacting state and territory and an agency thereof. The commission shall have all the powers and duties set forth herein, including the power to sue and be sued, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the respective legislatures of the compacting states and territories.

Article IV

The commission shall consist of three (3) resident members from each compacting state or territory. At all times one (1) commissioner from each compacting state or territory shall be an educator engaged in the field of higher education in the state or territory from which he is appointed.

The commissioners from each state and territory shall be appointed by the governor thereof as provided by law in such state or territory. Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as provided by law of the state or territory from which he shall have been appointed. The terms of each commissioner shall be four (4) years; provided however that the first three (3) commissioners shall be appointed as follows: one (1) for two (2) years, one (1) for three (3) years, and one (1) for four (4) years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. If any office becomes vacant for any reason, the governor shall appoint a commissioner to fill the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Article V

Any business transacted at any meeting of the commission must be by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole number of compacting states and territories.

One (1) or more commissioners from a majority of the compacting states and territories shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Each compacting state and territory represented at any meeting of the commission is entitled to one (1) vote.

Article VI

The commission shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice chairman, and may appoint, and at its pleasure dismiss or remove, such officers, agents, and employees as may be required to carry out the purpose of this compact; and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation, having due regard for the importance of the responsibilities involved.

The commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses from the funds of the commission.

Article VII

The commission shall adopt a seal and bylaws and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its management and control.

The commission may elect such committees as it deems necessary for the carrying out of its functions.

The commission shall establish and maintain an office within one (1) of the compacting states for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time but in any event must meet at least once a year. The chairman may call such additional meetings and upon the request of a majority of the commissioners of three (3) or more compacting states or territories shall call additional meetings.

The commission shall submit a budget to the governor of each compacting state and territory at such time and for such period as may be required.

The commission shall, after negotiations with interested institutions, determine the cost of providing the facilities for graduate and professional education for use in its contractual agreements throughout the region.

On or before the fifteenth day of January of each year, the commission shall submit to the governors and legislatures of the compacting states and territories a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year.

The commission shall keep accurate books of account, showing in full its receipts and disbursements, and said books of account shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by the governor of any compacting state or territory or his designated representative. The commission shall not be subject to the audit and accounting procedure of any of the compacting states or territories. The commission shall provide for an independent annual audit.

Article VIII

It shall be the duty of the commission to enter into such contractual agreements with any institutions in the region offering graduate or professional education and with any of the compacting states or territories as may be required in the judgment of the commission to provide adequate services and facilities of graduate and professional education for the citizens of the respective compacting states or territories. The commission shall first endeavor to provide adequate services and facilities in the fields of dentistry, medicine, public health, and veterinary medicine, and may undertake similar activities in other professional and graduate fields.

For this purpose the commission may enter into contractual agreements:

With the governing authority of any educational institution in the region, or with any compacting state or territory, to provide such graduate or professional educational services upon terms and conditions to be agreed upon between contracting parties; and

With the governing authority of any educational institution in the region or with any compacting state or territory to assist in the placement of graduate or professional students in educational institutions in the region providing the desired services and facilities, upon such terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe.

It shall be the duty of the commission to undertake studies of needs for professional and graduate educational facilities in the region, the resources of meeting such needs, and the long-range effects of the compact on higher education; and from time to time prepare comprehensive reports on such research for presentation to the western governor's conference and to the legislatures of the compacting states and territories. In conducting such studies, the commission may confer with any national or regional planning body which may be established. The commission shall draft and recommend to the governors of the various compacting states and territories, uniform legislation dealing with problems of higher education in the region.

For the purposes of this compact the word “region” shall be construed to mean the geographical limits of the several compacting states and territories.

Article IX

The operating costs of the commission shall be apportioned equally among the compacting states and territories.

Article X

This compact shall become operative and binding immediately as to those states and territories adopting it whenever five (5) or more of the states or territories of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, and Hawaii have duly adopted it prior to July 1, 1953. This compact shall become effective as to any additional states or territories adopting thereafter at the time of such adoption.

Article XI

This compact may be terminated at any time by consent of a majority of the compacting states or territories. Consent shall be manifested by passage and signature in the usual manner of legislation expressing such consent by the legislature and governor of such terminating state. Any state or territory may at any time withdraw from this compact by means of appropriate legislation to that end. Such withdrawal shall not become effective until two (2) years after written notice thereof by the governor of the withdrawing state or territory accompanied by a certified copy of the requisite legislative action as received by the commission. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state or territory from its obligation hereunder accruing prior to the effective date of withdrawal. The withdrawing state or territory may rescind its action of withdrawal at any time within the two (2) year period. Thereafter, the withdrawing state or territory may be reinstated by application to and the approval by a majority vote of the commission.

Article XII

If any compacting state or territory shall at any time default in the performance of any of its obligations assumed or imposed in accordance with the provisions of this compact, all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact or agreements hereunder shall be suspended from the effective date of such default as fixed by the commission.

Unless such default shall be remedied within a period of two (2) years following the effective date of such default, this compact may be terminated with respect to such defaulting state or territory by affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other member states or territories.

Any such defaulting state may be reinstated by:

Performing all acts and obligations upon which it has heretofore defaulted; and

Application to and the approval by a majority vote of the commission.

Editor's notes. —

Alaska and Hawaii, referred to as territories in the compact, became states in 1959.

§ 21-16-202.
When binding; notice of ratification; power of governor to appoint commissioners; powers of commissioners generally; appropriation of monies.

The compact shall become operative and binding at the time provided, and in accordance with article X of the compact. The governor of Wyoming shall give notice of the approval, ratification and adoption of the compact by the legislature of the state of Wyoming, to the governors of each of the states and territories named in article X of the compact. The governor shall appoint the commissioners for which provision is made in the compact and the commissioners shall have the power and authority specified in the compact, and such other power and authority as may hereafter be prescribed by law.

In addition to those powers granted to the commissioners in the compact, the commissioners are directed and empowered:

To control and authorize the expenditure of any funds appropriated for carrying out the provisions of the compact;

To ratify any contracts entered into by the western interstate commission for higher education or its officers which are deemed to be in the best interest of the state of Wyoming and its qualified students;

To impose residency requirements on admission to compact programs. Applicants may appeal any admission decisions rendered pursuant to this paragraph directly to the commission; and

In the interest of recruiting health care professionals to Wyoming, to impose a repayment program for participating students in dentistry, medicine, podiatry, occupational therapy, physical therapy, optometry, physician assistant programs and osteopathic medicine and obtain an agreement from each student first admitted as a WICHE program student to a participating institution of higher education for the 2013-2014 academic year and thereafter, subject to the following:

The student agrees to:

Actively engage in full-time professional practice in Wyoming in the field in which he was educated for not less than three (3) years as the commission requires. The taking of a medical residency program in the state shall be credited toward the practice requirements at the rate of one-third (1/3) year of full-time practice for each year of service in a medical residency program in the state; or

Repay all amounts expended by the state of Wyoming on the student’s education through the WICHE program, together with interest which shall begin accruing after the student’s graduation or residency, whichever is later, but in no event later than eight (8) years after the student enters into an agreement, upon terms specified by the commission. However, interest shall begin to accrue when the student has withdrawn from the professional school or a residency program as determined by the commission or is otherwise not making satisfactory progress toward completion of the degree program as determined by the commission. Money expended under this paragraph shall accrue at an annual interest rate equal to that charged for federal Stafford loans at the time interest begins to accrue, which rate shall be adjusted annually to equal the federal Stafford loan rate. In no event shall the interest rate be greater than eight percent (8%).

Upon application of the student, the commission may relieve a student of the obligation to repay amounts expended under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, in whole or in part, where repayment would cause undue hardship. The commission shall annually report the number of students relieved from repayment under this subparagraph to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1;

Any amounts paid by medical, podiatry, osteopathic, occupational therapy, physical therapy, optometry, physician assistant or dental students in accordance with the contractual arrangements authorized under this paragraph shall be credited to a WICHE program repayment account which shall be expended upon appropriation by the legislature;

The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to the field of veterinary medicine.

All monies appropriated for the purposes of the compact shall be appropriated to the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming for administration as directed by the commissioners.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 106, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-333; Laws 1975, ch. 48, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-1-202; 1995, ch. 107, § 1; 2011, ch. 181, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

added (b)(iv), and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 181, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.